District of Columbia statutes.
29-409.02

Merger.

(a)

One or more domestic nonprofit corporations may merge with one or more domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations pursuant to a plan of merger or 2 or more foreign nonprofit corporations or domestic nonprofit corporations may merge into a new domestic nonprofit corporation to be created in the merger in the manner provided in this subchapter.

(b)

A foreign nonprofit corporation may be a party to a merger with a domestic nonprofit corporation, or may be created by the terms of the plan of merger, only if the merger is permitted by the organic law of the corporation.

(c)

If the organic law of a domestic eligible entity shall not prohibit a merger with a nonprofit corporation but does not provide procedures for the approval of such a merger, a plan of merger may be adopted and approved, and the merger may be effectuated, in accordance with the procedures in this subchapter.

(d)

The plan of merger shall be in the form of a record and include:

(1)

The name of each domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation that will merge and the name of the domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation that will be the survivor of the merger;

(2)

The terms and conditions of the merger;

(3)

The manner and basis of converting the memberships of each merging domestic or foreign nonprofit membership corporation into memberships, eligible interests, securities, or obligations; rights to acquire memberships, eligible interests, securities, or obligations; cash; other property or other consideration; or any combination of the foregoing;

(4)

The articles of incorporation and bylaws of any corporation to be created by the merger, or if a new corporation is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to the survivor’s articles or bylaws or organic records; and

(5)

Any other provisions relating to the merger that the parties desire be included in the plan of merger.

(e)

The plan of merger may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of merger, but if the members of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan shall provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by such members the plan shall not be amended to change:

(1)

The amount or kind of memberships, eligible interests, securities, or obligations; rights to acquire memberships, eligible interests, securities, or obligations; cash; or other property or other consideration to be received by the members of or owners of eligible interests in any party to the merger;

(2)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws of any corporation, or the organic records of any unincorporated entity, that will survive or be created as a result of the merger, except for changes permitted by § 29-408.05 or by comparable provisions of the organic law of any such foreign nonprofit or business corporation or domestic or foreign unincorporated entity; or

(3)

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect such members in any material respect.

(f)

Terms of a plan of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with § 29-401.04.

(g)

A merger in which a nonprofit corporation and another form of entity are parties is governed by Chapter 2 of this title.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-409.01.